Oklahoma, session 2025, SB766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 51.1b of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Targeted


Violence Prevention Act”.


B. The Office of Homeland Security is authorized to collect,


analyze, and disseminate information concerning the activity and


identity of individuals reasonably suspected of involvement in


terrorism, targeted violence, threats to public safety, or any other

Req. No. 339 Page 1


threats of organized or violent crime to law enforcement and public


safety agencies.


C. Any information disseminated pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall be confidential, and the recipients of such


information shall comply with the handling terms associated with the


disclosure. Unauthorized release or unauthorized use of information


disseminated pursuant to this section shall be a felony punishable


by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for


a term not to exceed three (3) years, a fine not more than Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and


fine. Such offense shall also be punishable by termination of


employment and revocation of the individual’s certification as a


peace officer in this state. As used in this subsection,


“unauthorized release” or “unauthorized use” shall include, but not


be limited to, disseminating or disclosing confidential information


in a manner which exceeds the scope of the handling terms associated


with the disclosure or is in violation of any rules promulgated


pursuant to this act. Provided, however, the following shall not


constitute an unauthorized release or unauthorized use of


confidential information disseminated by the Office:


1. Sharing the confidential information with a law enforcement


officer or prosecutorial authority for use in a criminal


investigation or prosecution; or



Req. No. 339 Page 2


2. Sharing the confidential information with the express


authority of the Homeland Security Advisor or the Advisor’s


designee.


D. Information collected or disseminated pursuant to the


provisions of this section shall be privileged and not discoverable


nor subject to subpoena or order for production issued by any court,


other than production in a district court criminal proceeding for


the prosecution of crimes which are the subject of the information


sought.


E. The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized to


promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 51.1, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 257, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 51.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 51.1. A. There is hereby created within the Department


of Public Safety, the Office of Homeland Security. The Commissioner


of Public Safety shall be the Homeland Security Advisor and shall


possess or obtain federally recognized clearances as appropriate to


perform the duties of the position. The Commissioner of Public


Safety, as Homeland Security Advisor, shall be responsible for the


operation and administration of the Office. The Commissioner shall


appoint subordinates and employees and may make such expenditures


with appropriated funds, or from such other available funds as may



Req. No. 339 Page 3


be necessary to carry out the purposes of the Oklahoma Homeland


Security Act and other programs specified by law.


B. The Commissioner may commission any employees appointed to


the Office as peace officers. Any member of the Office who receives


a commission pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall


exercise the powers and authority of an officer of the Department of


Public Safety, as provided for in Section 2-117 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, provided such commissions shall be subject to all


requirements set forth by the Commissioner, and the Commissioner may


set forth any limitations on the power and scope of the commission.


All commissioned staff must obtain and maintain certification as


full-time peace officers in accordance with the provisions of


Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The Office of Homeland Security shall consist of at least


three functions:


1. Prevention and Intelligence;


2. Response and Recovery Planning; and


3. Awareness and Preparedness.


D. Other federal, state, and local personnel may be assigned to


the Office of Homeland Security pursuant to an interagency


agreement. All positions and personnel of the Office of Homeland


Security shall be exempt from the full-time employee limit of the


Department of Public Safety.



Req. No. 339 Page 4


E. The Office of Homeland Security shall have the duty and


responsibility to develop and coordinate the implementation and


administration of a comprehensive statewide strategy that is


integrated into the emergency operations plan to secure this state


from the results of acts of terrorism, from a public health


emergency, from cyberterrorism, and from weapons of mass destruction


as that term is defined in 18 U.S.C., Section 2332a, and to perform


other duties assigned by the Commissioner. These duties shall


include but not be limited to:


1. Representing this state with federal agencies as the state


Homeland Security Advisor for purposes of accessing federal funds


and cooperating with federal agencies in the development and


implementation of a nationwide homeland security plan of response;


and


2. Coordinating the Homeland Security efforts within this state


including working with the Governor and Legislature, state agencies,


and local elected officials and local governments, emergency


responder groups, private-sector businesses, educational


institutions, volunteer organizations, and the general public.


State agencies receiving federal funding for homeland security


purposes shall report the amount and intended use of those funds to


the Office of Homeland Security to ensure efficient use of funds and


to avoid duplication of efforts.



Req. No. 339 Page 5


F. Included in the comprehensive statewide strategy and


consistent with the National Strategy for Homeland Security, as


promulgated by the Executive Office of the President of the United


States, or its successor plan or plans, the Office of Homeland


Security shall establish the following strategic objectives for this


state:


1. To prevent terrorist attacks;


2. To reduce vulnerability to terrorism;


3. To minimize the damage from and to recover from terrorist


attacks; and


4. Such other duties as the Governor may prescribe.


G. The Office of Homeland Security shall have the following


duties:


1. Establish a plan for the effective implementation of a


statewide emergency all-hazards response system including the duties


and responsibilities of regional emergency response teams;


2. Create, implement, and administer an advisory system;


3. Coordinate and prepare applications for federal funds


related to homeland security and accessing and distributing the


federal funds; and


4. Cooperate with federal agencies in the development and


implementation of a nationwide homeland security plan or response.


H. The Office of Homeland Security may enter into contracts,


agreements, and memoranda of understanding with any public agency,

Req. No. 339 Page 6


as defined in Section 1003 of this title, for equipment and


personnel, or both, to carry out the requirements of the Oklahoma


Homeland Security Act. Such agreements may include any provisions


agreed upon by the parties and as required by any federal or state


grant, if applicable.


I. All state agencies and political subdivisions of this state


and all officers and employees of those agencies and political


subdivisions are hereby directed to cooperate with and lend


assistance to the Office of Homeland Security.


J. All personnel, motor vehicles, computer and communications


equipment, training equipment, records, furniture, and other


property and equipment allocated to the Office of Homeland Security


shall remain with the Office of Homeland Security upon its transfer


from the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management to the


Department of Public Safety as of the effective date of this act May


1, 2024.


K. The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-339 CN 1/19/2025 5:42:55 AM

Req. No. 339 Page 7